Nevada, session 83, AB20.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 483.3485 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
483.3485 1. The Department may adopt regulations
establishing a program for the imprinting of a symbol indicating a
medical condition on a driver’s license issued by the Department.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. If the Department establishes a program pursuant to
subsection 1:
(a) [Except as otherwise provided in this title, the] The
Department shall adopt a single symbol for imprinting on a driver’s
license to indicate a medical condition and [shall not] may also
adopt individualized symbols or codes for different medical
conditions.
(b) The regulations adopted by the Department must provide
that a person is eligible to have the symbol indicating a medical
condition imprinted on his or her driver’s license if the person is:
(1) On anticoagulants; or
(2) A person with:
(I) Diabetes;
(II) Epilepsy;
(III) Blindness and low vision;
(IV) Deafness;
(V) Coronary atherosclerosis;
(VI) Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease;
(VII) A food allergy;
(VIII) Malignant hyperthermia;
(IX) Sickle cell disease;
(X) Systemic lupus erythematosus;
(XI) Heart disease;
(XII) Hemophilia;
(XIII) Schizophrenia;
(XIV) Depression; or
(XV) A mental illness.
(c) The Department shall maintain a record of the medical
condition for which the symbol indicating a medical condition was
imprinted on the driver’s license of an eligible person. The record
must be maintained in the same location and manner as all other
records relating to the driver’s license of the person, including,
without limitation, the records relating to the driver’s license of the
person that are made available to law enforcement agencies. If
the Department maintains such information in the form of a code,
the code used must conform with the International Classification of
Diseases, Ninth Revision, Clinical Modification, or the most current
revision, adopted by the National Center for Health Statistics and
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(d) The Department shall maintain on the Internet website of the
Department information about the program established pursuant to
subsection 1, including, without limitation, the manner in which a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
person may obtain a driver’s license which has been imprinted with
a symbol indicating a medical condition.
(e) The regulations adopted by the Department may provide that
a person is eligible to have the symbol indicating a medical
condition imprinted on his or her driver’s license to indicate such
other medical conditions not listed in paragraph (b) as the
Department deems appropriate. The Department shall provide a
means for members of the public to suggest additional medical
conditions for inclusion in the regulations adopted by the
Department.
3. The Department may apply for and accept any gift, grant,
appropriation or other donation to assist in carrying out a program
established pursuant to the provisions of this section.
Sec. 2. NRS 483.863 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.863 1. The Department may adopt regulations
establishing a program for the imprinting of a symbol indicating a
medical condition on an identification card issued by the
Department.
2. If the Department establishes a program pursuant to
subsection 1:
(a) [Except as otherwise provided in this title, the] The
Department shall adopt a single symbol for imprinting on an
identification card to indicate a medical condition and [shall not]
may also adopt individualized symbols or codes for different
medical conditions.
(b) The regulations adopted by the Department must provide
that a person is eligible to have the symbol indicating a medical
condition imprinted on his or her identification card if the person is:
(1) On anticoagulants; or
(2) A person with:
(I) Diabetes;
(II) Epilepsy;
(III) Blindness and low vision;
(IV) Deafness;
(V) Coronary atherosclerosis;
(VI) Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease;
(VII) A food allergy;
(VIII) Malignant hyperthermia;
(IX) Sickle cell disease;
(X) Systemic lupus erythematosus;
(XI) Heart disease;
(XII) Hemophilia;
(XIII) Schizophrenia;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(XIV) Depression; or
(XV) A mental illness.
(c) The Department shall maintain a record of the medical
condition for which the symbol indicating a medical condition was
imprinted on the identification card of an eligible person. The record
must be maintained in the same location and manner as all other
records relating to the identification card of the person, including,
without limitation, the records relating to the identification card of
the person that are available to law enforcement agencies. If the
Department maintains such information in the form of a code, the
code used must conform with the International Classification of
Diseases, Ninth Revision, Clinical Modification, or the most current
revision, adopted by the National Center for Health Statistics and
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(d) The Department shall, at the time of the issuance or renewal
of an identification card, give the holder the opportunity to have
imprinted on his or her identification card a symbol indicating a
medical condition.
(e) The Department shall maintain on the Internet website of the
Department information about the program established pursuant to
subsection 1, including, without limitation, the manner in which a
person may obtain an identification card which has been imprinted
with a symbol indicating a medical condition.
(f) The regulations adopted by the Department may provide that
a person is eligible to have the symbol indicating a medical
condition imprinted on his or her identification card to indicate such
other medical conditions not listed in paragraph (b) as the
Department deems appropriate. The Department shall provide a
means for members of the public to suggest additional medical
conditions for inclusion in the regulations adopted by the
Department.
3. The Department may apply for and accept any gift, grant,
appropriation or other donation to assist in carrying out a program
established pursuant to the provisions of this section.
Sec. 3. NRS 485.317 is hereby amended to read as follows:
485.317 1. The Department shall verify that each motor
vehicle which is registered in this State is covered by a policy of
liability insurance as required by NRS 485.185.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
Department may use any information to verify whether a motor
vehicle is covered by a policy of liability insurance as required by
NRS 485.185. The Department may not use the name of the owner
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
of a motor vehicle as the primary means of verifying that a motor
vehicle is covered by a policy of liability insurance.
3. If the Department is unable to verify that a motor vehicle is
covered by a policy of liability insurance as required by NRS
485.185, the Department shall send a request for information by
[first-class] mail or, if the registered owner of the motor vehicle
has elected to receive information from the Department by
electronic notification, by electronic notification, to the registered
owner of the motor vehicle. The owner shall submit all the
information which is requested to the Department within 15 days
after the date on which the request for information was [mailed] sent
by the Department. If the Department does not receive the requested
information within 15 days after it [mailed] sent the request to the
owner, the Department shall send to the owner a notice of
suspension of registration by certified mail [.] or a mail service that
requires the signature of the recipient and confirmation of
delivery and, if the owner has elected to receive information from
the Department by electronic notification, by electronic
notification. The notice must inform the owner that unless the
Department is able to verify that the motor vehicle is covered by a
policy of liability insurance as required by NRS 485.185 within 10
days after the date on which the notice was sent by the Department,
the owner’s registration will be suspended pursuant to subsection 4.
4. The Department shall suspend the registration and require
the return to the Department of the license plates of any vehicle for
which the Department cannot verify the coverage of liability
insurance required by NRS 485.185.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, the
Department shall reinstate the registration of the vehicle and reissue
the license plates only upon verification of current insurance and
compliance with the requirements for reinstatement of registration
prescribed in paragraph (a) of subsection 7 of NRS 482.480.
6. If the Department suspends the registration of a motor
vehicle pursuant to subsection 4 because the registered owner of the
motor vehicle failed to have insurance on the date specified in the
form for verification, and if the registered owner, in accordance with
regulations adopted by the Department, proves to the satisfaction of
the Department that the owner was unable to comply with the
provisions of NRS 485.185 on that date because of extenuating
circumstances or that the motor vehicle was a dormant vehicle and
the owner failed to cancel the registration in accordance with
subsection 3 of NRS 485.320, the Department may:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(a) Reinstate the registration of the motor vehicle and reissue the
license plates upon payment by the registered owner of a fee of $50,
which must be deposited in the Account for Verification of
Insurance created by subsection 7 of NRS 482.480; or
(b) Remove the suspension of the registration without the
payment of a fee or administrative fine.
 The Department shall adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this subsection.
Sec. 4. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
3. Section 3 of this act becomes effective on October 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)